Utah statutes.
65A-14-103.   Scope of chapter.

(1)  This chapter does not modify or replace any other requirement under federal, state, or local law related to an act that under this chapter is considered bioprospecting, including any requirement to obtain the permission of a landowner.

(2)  This chapter applies only to non-federal public land.



Enacted by Chapter 21, 2010 General Session

